Oklahoma, session 2025, SB661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 92.6, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 92.6. District No. 5. The counties of Comanche,


Stephens, Cotton and Jefferson. Said The district shall have five


(5) district judges to be nominated as follows: Candidates for


office Nos. 1 and 4 to shall be nominated and elected at large and


legal residents of Comanche or Cotton County and shall be nominated


and elected from such counties; a candidate for office No. 2 to


shall be nominated and elected at large and a legal resident of


Stephens or Jefferson County and shall be nominated and elected from


such counties; and candidates for office Nos. 3 and 5 to shall be



Req. No. 839 Page 1


nominated and elected at large and legal residents of Comanche


County and shall be nominated and elected from such county.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 92.22, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 92.22. District No. 21. The counties of Garvin,


McClain and Cleveland. Until the district court elections of 2014,


said district to have four (4) district judges nominated as follows:


Candidates for office Nos. 1, 3 and 4 shall be nominated and elected


at large and legal residents of Cleveland County, and a candidate


for office No. 2 shall be nominated and elected at large and a legal


resident of Garvin or McClain County. With the district court


elections of 2014, said The district to shall have five (5) district


judges nominated as follows: Candidates for office Nos. 1, 3, 4 and


shall be nominated and elected at large and legal residents of


Cleveland County and shall be nominated and elected from such


county, and a candidate for office No. 2 shall be nominated and


elected at large and a legal resident of Garvin or McClain County


and shall be nominated and elected from such counties. The initial


election for office No. 5, as created by this act, shall be in 2014.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-839 TEK 1/19/2025 5:40:55 AM





Req. No. 839 Page 2